Colorado statutes. TITLE 7 Corporations and Associations
PART 3
JUDICIAL DISSOLUTION

7-134-301. Grounds for judicial dissolution.

A nonprofit corporation may be dissolved in a proceeding by the attorney general if it is established that:

The nonprofit corporation obtained its articles of incorporation through fraud; or

The nonprofit corporation has continued to exceed or abuse the authority conferred upon it by law.

A nonprofit corporation may be dissolved in a proceeding by a director or member if it is established that:

The directors are deadlocked in the management of the corporate affairs, the members, if any, are unable to break the deadlock, and irreparable injury to the nonprofit corporation is threatened or being suffered;

The directors or those otherwise in control of the nonprofit corporation have acted, are acting, or will act in a manner that is illegal, oppressive, or fraudulent;

The members are deadlocked in voting power and have failed, for a period that includes at least two consecutive annual meeting dates, to elect successors to directors whose terms have expired or would have expired upon the election of their successors; or

The corporate assets are being misapplied or wasted.

A nonprofit corporation may be dissolved in a proceeding by a creditor if it is established that:

The creditor's claim has been reduced to judgment, the execution on the judgment has been returned unsatisfied, and the nonprofit corporation is insolvent; or

The nonprofit corporation is insolvent and the nonprofit corporation has admitted in writing that the creditor's claim is due and owing.

If a nonprofit corporation has been dissolved by voluntary action taken under part 1 of this article:

The nonprofit corporation may bring a proceeding to wind up and liquidate its business and affairs under judicial supervision in accordance with section 7-134-105; and

The attorney general, a director, a member, or a creditor may bring a proceeding to wind up and liquidate the affairs of the nonprofit corporation under judicial supervision in accordance with section 7-134-105, upon establishing the grounds set forth in subsections (1) to (3) of this section.

As used in sections 7-134-302 to 7-134-304, a "proceeding to dissolve a nonprofit corporation" includes a proceeding brought under this subsection (4), and a "decree of dissolution" includes an order of court entered in a proceeding under this subsection (4) that directs that the affairs of a nonprofit corporation shall be wound up and liquidated under judicial supervision.

Source:

L. 97:

Entire article added, p. 728, § 3, effective July 1, 1998.

L. 2004:

(4)(b) amended, p. 1514, § 308, effective July 1.

L. 2005:

IP(4)(a) amended, p. 1219, § 30, effective October 1.

7-134-302. Procedure for judicial dissolution.

A proceeding by the attorney general to dissolve a nonprofit corporation shall be brought in the district court for the county in this state in which the street address of the nonprofit corporation's principal office or the street address of its registered agent is located or, if the nonprofit corporation has no principal office in this state and no registered agent, in the district court for the city and county of Denver. A proceeding brought by any other party named in section 7-134-301 shall be brought in the district court for the county in this state in which the street address of the nonprofit corporation's principal office is located or, if it has no principal office in this state, in the district court for the county in which the street address of its registered agent is located, or, if the nonprofit corporation has no registered agent, in the district court for the city and county of Denver.

It is not necessary to make directors or members parties to a proceeding to dissolve a nonprofit corporation unless relief is sought against them individually.

A court in a proceeding brought to dissolve a nonprofit corporation may issue injunctions, appoint a receiver or custodian pendente lite with all powers and duties the court directs, take other action required to preserve the corporate assets wherever located, and carry on the activities of the nonprofit corporation until a full hearing can be held.

Source:

L. 97:

Entire article added, p. 729, § 3, effective July 1, 1998.

L. 2003:

(1) amended, p. 2349, § 328, effective July 1, 2004.

7-134-303. Receivership or custodianship.

A court in a judicial proceeding to dissolve a nonprofit corporation may appoint one or more receivers to wind up and liquidate, or one or more custodians to manage, the affairs of the nonprofit corporation. The court shall hold a hearing, after giving notice to all parties to the proceeding and any interested persons designated by the court, before appointing a receiver or custodian. The court appointing a receiver or custodian has exclusive jurisdiction over the nonprofit corporation and all of its property, wherever located.

The court may appoint an individual, a domestic entity, or a foreign entity authorized to transact business or conduct activities in this state, or a domestic or foreign nonprofit corporation authorized to transact business or conduct activities in this state as a receiver or custodian. The court may require the receiver or custodian to post bond, with or without sureties, in an amount stated by the court.

The court shall describe the powers and duties of the receiver or custodian in its appointing order which may be amended from time to time. Among other powers the receiver shall have the power to:

Dispose of all or any part of the property of the nonprofit corporation, wherever located, at a public or private sale, if authorized by the court; and

Sue and defend in the receiver's own name as receiver of the nonprofit corporation in all courts.

The custodian may exercise all of the powers of the nonprofit corporation, through or in place of its board of directors or officers, to the extent necessary to manage the affairs of the nonprofit corporation in the best interests of its members and creditors.

The court, during a receivership, may redesignate the receiver a custodian and during a custodianship may redesignate the custodian a receiver if doing so is in the best interests of the nonprofit corporation and its members and creditors.

The court from time to time during the receivership or custodianship may order compensation paid and expense disbursements or reimbursements made to the receiver or custodian and such person's counsel from the assets of the nonprofit corporation or proceeds from the sale of the assets.

Source:

L. 97:

Entire article added, p. 730, § 3, effective July 1, 1998.

L. 2003:

(2) amended, p. 2349, § 329, effective July 1, 2004.

L. 2004:

(1) amended, p. 1515, § 309, effective July 1.

7-134-304. Decree of dissolution.

If after a hearing the court determines that one or more grounds for judicial dissolution described in section 7-134-301 exist, it may enter a decree dissolving the nonprofit corporation and stating the effective date of the dissolution, and the clerk of the court shall deliver a certified copy of the decree to the secretary of state for filing pursuant to part 3 of article 90 of this title.

After entering the decree of dissolution, the court shall direct the winding up and liquidation of the nonprofit corporation's activities in accordance with section 7-134-105 and the giving of notice to claimants in accordance with sections 7-90-911 and 7-90-912.

The court's order or decision may be appealed as in other civil proceedings.

Source:

L. 97:

Entire article added, p. 731, § 3, effective July 1, 1998.

L. 2003:

(1) and (2) amended, p. 2350, § 330, effective July 1, 2004.

L. 2004:

(2) amended, p. 1515, § 310, effective July 1.

L. 2006:

(2) amended, p. 883, § 84, effective July 1.